Utah statutes.
75-5-502.   Other powers of attorney not revoked until notice of death or
disability.
(1)  The death, disability, or incompetence of any principal who has executed
a power of attorney in writing other than a power as described by Section
75-5-501, does not revoke or terminate the agency as to the attorney-in-fact,
agent, or other person who, without actual knowledge of the death, disability,
or incompetence of the principal, acts in good faith under the power of
attorney or agency.  Any action so taken, unless otherwise invalid or
unenforceable, binds the principal and his heirs, devisees, and personal
representatives.  This power is exercisable notwithstanding the lapse of time
since the execution of the instrument, unless the instrument states a time of
termination.
(2)  An affidavit, executed by the attorney-in-fact or agent stating that he
did not have, at the time of doing an act pursuant to the power of attorney,
actual knowledge of the revocation or termination of the power of attorney by
death, disability, or incompetence is, in the absence of fraud, conclusive
proof of the nonrevocation or nontermination of the power at that time.  If
the exercise of the power requires execution and delivery of any instrument
which is recordable, the affidavit when authenticated for the record is
likewise recordable.
(3)  This section may not be construed to alter or affect any provision for
revocation or termination contained in the power of attorney. Notwithstanding
any provision of the power of attorney to the contrary, the power of attorney
ends at death subject to the provisions of this section.
